New York, session 2025-2026, S7207.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 12-143 to read as follows: 3 § 12-143 Reinstatement of certain officers and employees dismissed for 4 COVID-19 vaccination requirements. Officers or employees including reti- 5 rees, vested members and members terminated without a one-year limit on 6 return of the city or of any agency thereof who were dismissed from 7 employment due to the failure of such officer or employee to comply with 8 a COVID-19 vaccine requirement, shall be reinstated to their former 9 position, in the same position or title and at the same salary and bene- 10 fits with retention of seniority, as such employee was receiving imme- 11 diately prior to their dismissal. Such officer or employee seeking rein- 12 statement shall also be exempt from any waiver of civil service rights. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06815-01-5